Utah statutes.
76-5-401.2.    Unlawful sexual conduct with a 16 or 17 year old.
(1)  As used in this section, "minor" means a person who is 16 years of age or
older, but younger than 18 years of age, at the time the sexual conduct
described in Subsection (2) occurred.
(2)  A person commits unlawful sexual conduct with a minor if, under
circumstances not amounting to an offense listed under Subsection (3), an
actor who is ten or more years older than the minor at the time of the sexual
conduct:
(a)  has sexual intercourse with the minor;
(b)  engages in any sexual act with the minor involving the genitals of one
person and the mouth or anus of another person, regardless of the sex of
either participant;
(c)  causes the penetration, however slight, of the genital or anal opening of
the minor by any foreign object, substance, instrument, or device, including a
part of the human body, with the intent to cause substantial emotional or
bodily pain to any person or with the intent to arouse or gratify the sexual
desire of any person, regardless of the sex of any participant; or
(d)  touches the anus, buttocks, or any part of the genitals of the minor, or
touches the breast of a female minor, or otherwise takes indecent liberties
with the minor, or causes a minor to take indecent liberties with the actor or
another person, with the intent to cause substantial emotional or bodily pain
to any person or with the intent to arouse or gratify the sexual desire of any
person regardless of the sex of any participant.
(3)  The offenses referred to in Subsection (2) are:
(a) (i)  rape, in violation of Section 76-5-402;
(ii)  object rape, in violation of Section 76-5-402.2;
(iii)  forcible sodomy, in violation of Section 76-5-403;
(iv)  forcible sexual abuse, in violation of Section 76-5-404; or
(v)  aggravated sexual assault, in violation of Section 76-5-405; or
(b)  an attempt to commit any offense under Subsection (3)(a).
(4)  A violation of Subsection (2)(a), (b), or (c) is a third degree felony.
(5)  A violation of Subsection (2)(d) is a class A misdemeanor.
